Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1302
Electric rate disputes; legislative determination.

In order to meet the policies set out in section 70-1301, protect the financial integrity of suppliers of electricity at wholesale, avoid imposing a discriminatory burden on purchasers of electricity at wholesale, and insure that wholesale rates are adequate, fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory, it is necessary to provide a method to expeditiously and fairly resolve wholesale electric rate disputes, including rate disputes relating to transmission and delivery of electrical energy, between the supplier of electrical energy and any and all of its purchasers of electricity at wholesale. To carry out such policies, the necessity for the enactment of sections 70-1301 to 70-1329 is hereby declared to be a matter of legislative determination.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 2.